Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-646
City manager; powers; duties.

The powers and duties of the city manager shall be (1) to see that the laws and ordinances of the city are enforced, (2) to appoint and remove all heads of city departments and all subordinate officers and employees in such departments in both the classified and unclassified service, which appointments shall be upon merit and fitness alone, and in the classified service all appointments and removals shall be subject to the civil service provisions of the Civil Service Act, (3) to exercise control over all city departments and divisions thereof that may be created by the city council, (4) to attend all meetings of the city council with the right to take part in the discussion but not to vote, (5) to recommend to the city council for adoption such measures as he or she may deem necessary or expedient, (6) to prepare the annual city budget and keep the city council fully advised as to the financial condition and needs of the city, and (7) to perform such other duties as may be required of him or her by the City Manager Plan of Government Act or by ordinance or resolution of the city council.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 47, p. 511;

C.S.1922, § 4584;

C.S.1929, § 19-647;

R.S.1943, § 19-646;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 53.

Civil Service Act, see section 19-1825.

This section vests city managers with authority to make employment decisions subject to the civil service provisions of the Civil Service Act. Busch v. Civil Service Commission, 21 Neb. App. 789, 844 N.W.2d 324 (2014).